foma/verb/ThamizhiVerbs-C12.lexc
LEXICON C12Vinf


%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+past%=%(ன்%)ற்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^ன்றேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+past%=%(ன்%)ற்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^ன்றோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+past%=%(ன்%)ற்%|+1sg%=அன்:^ன்றன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+past%=%(ன்%)ற்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^ன்றாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+past%=%(ன்%)ற்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^ன்றீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+past%=%(ன்%)ற்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^ன்றீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+past%=%(ன்%)ற்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^ன்றான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+past%=%(ன்%)ற்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^ன்றாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+past%=%(ன்%)ற்%|+3sge%=அர்:^ன்றர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+past%=%(ன்%)ற்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^ன்றார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+past%=%(ன்%)ற்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்:^ன்றார் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+past%=%(ன்%)ற்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^ன்றார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+past%=%(ன்%)ற்%|+3sgn%=அது:^ன்றது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+past%=%(ன்%)ற்%|+3pln%=அன:^ன்றன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^கிறேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^கிறோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+1sg%=அன்:^கிறன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^கிறாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^கிறீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^கிறீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^கிறான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^கிறாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3sge%=அர்:^கிறர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^கிறார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^கிறார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3sgn%=அது:^கிறது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3pln%=அன:^கிறன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^கின்றேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^கின்றோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+1sg%=அன்:^கின்றன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^கின்றாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^கின்றீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^கின்றீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^கின்றான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^கின்றாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+3sge%=அர்:^கின்றர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^கின்றார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^கின்றார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+3sgn%=அது:^கின்றது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+3pln%=அன:^கின்றன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+weak%|+fut%=வ்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^வேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+weak%|+fut%=வ்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^வோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+weak%|+fut%=வ்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^வாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+weak%|+fut%=வ்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^வீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+weak%|+fut%=வ்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^வீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+weak%|+fut%=வ்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^வான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+weak%|+fut%=வ்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^வாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+weak%|+fut%=வ்%|+3sge%=அர்:^வர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+weak%|+fut%=வ்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^வார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+weak%|+fut%=வ்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^வார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+fut%=உம்%|+3sgn%=∅:^ும் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+fut%=உம்%|+3pln%=∅:^ும் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+past%=(ன்)ற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+1sg%=அன்:^ன்றனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+past%=(ன்)ற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgm%=அன்:^ன்றனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+past%=(ன்)ற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgf%=அள்:^ன்றனள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+1sg%=அன்:^கிறனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgm%=அன்:^கிறனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgf%=அள்:^கிறனள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+1sg%=அன்:^கின்றனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgm%=அன்:^கின்றனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgf%=அள்:^கின்றனள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+imp%=∅%|+2sg%=∅:^ #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+imp%=∅%|+2pl%=உங்கள்:^ுங்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+imp%=∅%|+neg%=ஆத்%|+euph%=ஏ:^ாதே #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+imp%=∅%|+neg%=ஆத்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^ாதீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+imp%=∅%|+neg%=ஆத்%|+euph%=ஏ:^ாதே #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+imp%=∅%|+neg%=ஆத்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^ாதீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=%(ன்%)ற்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^வின்றேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=%(ன்%)ற்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^வின்றோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=%(ன்%)ற்%|+1sg%=அன்:^வின்றன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=%(ன்%)ற்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^வின்றாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=%(ன்%)ற்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^வின்றீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=%(ன்%)ற்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^வின்றீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=%(ன்%)ற்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^வின்றான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=%(ன்%)ற்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^வின்றாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=%(ன்%)ற்%|+3sge%=அர்:^வின்றர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=%(ன்%)ற்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^வின்றார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=%(ன்%)ற்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^வின்றார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=%(ன்%)ற்%|+3sgn%=அது:^வின்றது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=%(ன்%)ற்%|+3pln%=அன:^வின்றன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^விகிறேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^விகிறோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+1sg%=அன்:^விகிறன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^விகிறாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^விகிறீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^விகிறீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^விகிறான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^விகிறாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3sge%=அர்:^விகிறர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^விகிறார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^விகிறார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3sgn%=அது:^விகிறது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3pln%=அன:^விகிறன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^விகின்றேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^விகின்றோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+1sg%=அன்:^விகின்றன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^விகின்றாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^விகின்றீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^விகின்றீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^விகின்றான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^விகின்றாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+3sge%=அர்:^விகின்றர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^விகின்றார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^விகின்றார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+3sgn%=அது:^விகின்றது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+3pln%=அன:^விகின்றன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+fut%=வ்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^விவேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+fut%=வ்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^விவோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+fut%=வ்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^விவாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+fut%=வ்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^விவீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+fut%=வ்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^விவீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+fut%=வ்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^விவான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+fut%=வ்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^விவாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+fut%=வ்%|+3sge%=அர்:^விவர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+fut%=வ்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^விவார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=வி%|+fut%=வ்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^விவார்கள் #;

LEXICON ClassTwelve
அண      C12Vinf;
அல      C12Vinf;
அலமல      C12Vinf;
அள      C12Vinf;
இக      C12Vinf;
இட      C12Vinf;
இய      C12Vinf;
இர      C12Vinf;
இரு      C12Vinf;
இழ      C12Vinf;
இற      C12Vinf;
உக      C12Vinf;
உல      C12Vinf;
உவ      C12Vinf;
உற      C12Vinf;
கச      C12Vinf;
கட      C12Vinf;
கய      C12Vinf;
கர      C12Vinf;
கற      C12Vinf;
கிட      C12Vinf;
கிள      C12Vinf;
குற      C12Vinf;
சிற      C12Vinf;
சும      C12Vinf;
சுற      C12Vinf;
செவ      C12Vinf;
தண      C12Vinf;
தவ      C12Vinf;
திற      C12Vinf;
துர      C12Vinf;
துழ      C12Vinf;
துற      C12Vinf;
பச      C12Vinf;
பய      C12Vinf;
பர      C12Vinf;
பற      C12Vinf;
பிள      C12Vinf;
பிற      C12Vinf;
புய      C12Vinf;
புர      C12Vinf;
புல      C12Vinf;
தல      C12Vinf;
நட      C12Vinf;
நிர      C12Vinf;
நிவ      C12Vinf;
மற      C12Vinf;
மித      C12Vinf;
வல      C12Vinf;
வற      C12Vinf;
வித      C12Vinf;
விய      C12Vinf;
விற      C12Vinf;
அண்ணா      C12Vinf;
அல்லா      C12Vinf;
அழா      C12Vinf;
இறுமா      C12Vinf;
ஏமா      C12Vinf;
சிம்மா      C12Vinf;
செம்மா      C12Vinf;
தண்ணா      C12Vinf;
தொண்ணா      C12Vinf;
பொச்சா      C12Vinf;
மல்கா      C12Vinf;
மல்லா      C12Vinf;
மாழா      C12Vinf;
மேலா      C12Vinf;
மையா      C12Vinf;
மோறா      C12Vinf;
விம்மா      C12Vinf;
விழுமா      C12Vinf;
மோ      C12Vinf;
அச	C12Vinf;
